dictionaries/mwy.dic
40
adre
amlach
amlddiwylliannedd/P
archaeolegwyr/P
arddullegol/P
Awstralia/N
bragod
cawson
Celtiaid
cryfach
culach
di/N
Dyfi/M
dyna/N
Ecwadoriad
Ecwadoriaid
e/N
fformiwlëig/F
Ffrancwyr
fi/N
Guto/N
hi/N
iddi/N
leoleiddio
Llanegryn
Llanfihangel
moyn
ni/N
o/N
ohono/N
pasbort/MTLA
pasborts/MTL
podlediad
podledwr/MTL
podledwyr/MTL
Rees
rhywfaint
sgrinlun/B
shwmae
siani
strwythuraeth
Talbot
Tan-y-braich
ti/LN
trwy/MLN
unrhywbeth
unrhywbryd
unrhywle
unrhywsut
unrhywun
uwchlwytho/P
Wicipedia
wladychol/MN
y
ymagweddiad/A
